Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1217
County attorney; deputy county attorney; continuing legal education required; failure to complete; effect.

Every county attorney and deputy county attorney in this state shall annually undertake and complete the required hours of continuing legal education, including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes against children, as prescribed by the council under section 23-1216. Failure on the part of any county attorney or deputy county attorney to complete the required number of hours of continuing legal education, including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes against children, may subject such county attorney or deputy county attorney to removal from office under section 23-1220.

Laws 1980, LB 790, § 6;

Laws 1990, LB 1246, § 3.